Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
Abandoned Mine Lands Reclamation Program

§ 53-9-101.
Priorities for expenditure of funds from Mine Lands Reclamation Account; certain sites and areas ineligible for expenditures; projects involving protection, repair, replacement, construction, or enhancement of certain utilities.

Expenditures of funds from the Abandoned Mine Lands Reclamation Account on eligible lands and water shall reflect the following priorities:

The protection of public health, safety, and property from extreme danger of adverse effects of coal mining practices;

The protection of public health and safety from adverse effects of coal mining practices; and

The restoration of land and water resources and the environment previously degraded by adverse effects of coal mining practices including measures for the conservation and development of soil, water (excluding channelization), woodland, fish and wildlife, recreation resources and agricultural productivity.

After certification under 30 USC 1240a(a) by the Governor to the United States Secretary of the Interior that all of the priorities stated in subsection (1) of this section for eligible lands and waters have been achieved, and upon concurrence by the secretary with that certification, funds in the Abandoned Mine Lands Reclamation Account may be used for reclamation at abandoned mine lands that were mined or processed for or effected by the mining or processing of noncoal minerals.Expenditure of funds for land, water and facilities referred to in this subsection shall reflect the following priorities in the order stated, in lieu of the priorities stated in subsection (1) of this section:

The protection of public health, safety, general welfare and property from extreme danger of adverse effects of mineral mining and processing practices;

The protection of public health, safety and general welfare from adverse effects of mineral mining and processing practices;

The restoration of land and water resources and the environment previously degraded by the adverse effects of mineral mining and processing practices.

Sites and areas designated for remedial action under the Uranium Mill Tailings Radiation Control Act of 1978, 42 USC 7901 et seq., or which have been listed for remedial action under the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act, 42 USC 9601 et seq., shall not be eligible for expenditure from the Abandoned Mine Lands Reclamation Account.

Reclamation projects involving the protection, repair, replacement, construction or enhancement of utilities, such as those relating to water supply, roads and such other facilities serving the public adversely affected by mineral mining and processing practices, and the construction of public facilities in communities impacted by coal or other mineral mining and processing practices, shall be deemed part of the objectives set forth and undertaken as they relate to the priorities stated in subsection (2) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 426, § 4; Laws, 2008, ch. 343, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 25, 2008.).

§ 53-9-103.
Only abandoned mines eligible for program expenditures.

Only abandoned mine lands are eligible for reclamation or drainage abatement expenditures from the Abandoned Mine Lands Reclamation Account.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 426, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 53-9-105.
Program to comply with federal law; required filings; public hearing and comment period; liability.

The department, through the Office of Geology, shall establish and maintain a state reclamation program for abandoned mines which complies with Subchapter IV of the federal Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, 30 USCS 1231 through 1243.

For any year in which the department intends to conduct abandoned mine lands reclamation with amounts held in the Abandoned Mine Lands Reclamation Account, the executive director shall submit to the secretary an application for the support of the state program and implementation of specific reclamation projects. Such requests shall include information required by the secretary. This may include, but is not limited to:

A general description of each proposed project;

A priority evaluation of each proposed project;

A statement of the estimated benefits in such terms as: number of acres restored, miles of stream improved, acres of surface lands protected from subsidence, population protected from subsidence, air pollution, hazards of mine and coal refuse disposal area fires;

An estimate of the cost for each proposed project;

In the case of proposed research and demonstration projects, a description of the specific techniques to be evaluated or objective to be attained;

An identification of lands or interest therein to be acquired and the estimated cost; and

In each year after the first in which a plan is filed, an inventory of each project funded under the previous year’s grant. This inventory shall include details of financial expenditures on each project together with a brief description of each project, including project locations, the landowner’s name, acreage, and the type of reclamation or abatement performed.

The reported costs for each proposed project shall include: actual construction costs, actual operation and maintenance costs of permanent facilities, planning and engineering costs, construction inspection costs, and other necessary administrative expenses.

The executive director shall make reports on operations of the reclamation program as required by the secretary or by Congress.

The executive director shall at all times accept and consider comments regarding annual grant applications and the eligibility, priority ranking and selection of lands for reclamation. At least thirty (30) days prior to the submission of each annual grant application to the secretary, the executive director shall provide for a public hearing and shall publish a notice regarding the proposed grant application and the public hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the state. The public notice shall state that a hearing will be held, generally outline the grant application, and solicit comments regarding the application. A listing and identification of all projects included in the grant application shall be mailed to all persons who have requested written notification of the annual grant application and shall be available to any person upon request. At the public hearing for review of an annual grant application, any person may appear before the executive director or his or her designee and be heard on the record. The executive director may receive documentary or other evidence for inclusion in the record. The executive director shall fix a time for the closing of the record and may, in his discretion, receive other comments or evidence that he deems appropriate after the public hearing and before the closing of the record. A copy of the record shall be included with the grant application to the secretary.

The state shall not be liable under any provision of federal law for any costs or damages as a result of action taken or omitted in the course of carrying out the state reclamation program approved by the secretary. This subsection shall not preclude liability for costs or damages as a result of gross negligence or intentional misconduct by the state. Reckless, willful or wanton misconduct shall constitute gross negligence. However, nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to waive any immunity provided by Mississippi law to the state or its employees, or to waive the protection afforded the state by the Eleventh Amendment to the United States Constitution.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 426, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 53-9-107.
Right of entry upon property adversely affected by past coal mining; order and required findings; right of entry upon property to conduct studies or exploratory work.

If the commission issues an order making a finding in writing with supporting facts that:

Land or water resources have been adversely affected by past coal mining practices;

The adverse effects are at a stage where, in the public interest, action to restore, reclaim, abate, control, or prevent should be taken;

The owners of the land or water resources where entry must be made to restore, reclaim, abate, control, or prevent the adverse effects of past coal mining practices are not known or readily available;

The owners will not give permission for the state or its agents, employees, or contractors to enter upon their property to restore, reclaim, abate, control, or prevent the adverse effects of past coal mining practices;

then, thirty (30) days after giving notice by mail to the owners if known or if not known, by posting notice on the premises and advertising once in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality or county where the land lies, the executive director, his agents, employees, or contractors shall have the right to enter upon the property adversely affected by past coal mining practices and any other property to have access to such property to do all things necessary or expedient to restore, reclaim, abate, control, or prevent the adverse effects if the landowner does not file an objection with the commission. If, within the thirty-day notice period, the landowner files an objection with the commission, the commission will schedule a hearing on the matter to be conducted under Section 49-17-41. After a hearing on the matter, the commission will issue an order including findings of facts and conclusions of law, which, if adverse to the landowner, may be appealed under Section 49-17-41. Such entry, if ordered by the commission, shall be construed as an exercise of the police power for the protection of public health, safety, and general welfare and shall not be construed as an act of condemnation of property or of trespass. The funds expended for this work and the benefits accruing to the premises entered on shall be chargeable against the land and shall mitigate or offset any claim in or any action brought by any owner of any interest in the premises for any alleged damages by virtue of such entry. This provision is not intended to create new rights of action or eliminate existing immunities.

The commission, its agents, employees, or contractors shall have the right to enter upon any property for the purpose of conducting studies or exploratory work to determine the existence of adverse effects of past coal and noncoal mining practices and to determine the feasibility of restoration, reclamation, abatement, control, or prevention of such adverse effects. Such entry shall be construed as an exercise of the police power for the protection of public health, safety, and general welfare and shall not be construed as an act of condemnation of property or trespass.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 426, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 53-9-109.
Acquisition of land adversely affected by past coal mining; sale of acquired land; administrative responsibility for acquired land; grants.

The commission, with the approval of the secretary, may acquire title in the name of the state to any land or interest in any land by purchase, donation, or condemnation if the land or interest is adversely affected by past coal mining practices and upon a determination that acquisition of this land is necessary to successful reclamation and that:

The acquired land after restoration, reclamation, abatement, control or prevention of the adverse effects of past coal mining practices will serve recreation and historical purposes, conservation and reclamation purposes or provide open space benefits;

Permanent facilities such as a treatment plant or a relocated stream channel will be constructed on the land for restoration, reclamation, abatement, control or prevention of the adverse effects of past coal mining practices;

Acquisition of coal refuse disposal sites and all coal refuse at the site will serve the purpose of this chapter or that public ownership is desirable to meet emergency situations and prevent recurrences of the adverse effects of past coal mining practices.

The commission shall only acquire land that is necessary for the reclamation work or the post reclamation use of the land and acquisition shall be limited by the scope of the project. The price paid for land acquired under this section shall reflect the fair market value of the land as adversely affected by past coal mining practices.

In addition to the authority to acquire land under subsection (1) of this section, the commission, with the approval of the secretary, is authorized to use money in the fund to acquire land by purchase, donation, or condemnation, and to reclaim and transfer acquired land to any agency of the state authorized to own and operate real property or to a political subdivision of the state, or to any person, firm, association, or corporation, if he determines that such is an integral and necessary element of an economically feasible plan for the project to construct or rehabilitate housing for persons disabled as the result of employment in the mines or work incidental thereto, persons displaced by acquisition of land pursuant to this section, or persons dislocated as the result of adverse effects of coal mining practices which constitute an emergency as provided in 30 USCS 1240 or persons dislocated as the result of natural disasters or catastrophic failures from any cause. Theseactivities shall be accomplished under the terms and conditions required for the secretary, which may include transfers of land with or without monetary consideration: to the extent that the consideration is below the fair market value of the land transferred, no portion of the difference between the fair market value and the consideration shall accrue as a profit to such persons, firm, association, or corporation. No part of the funds provided in this chapter may be used to pay the actual construction costs of housing. The commission, with approval of the secretary, and with grants received for the purposes of this subsection may make grants and commitments for grants and may advance money under the same terms and conditions as it may require of the state, or any department, agency, or instrumentality of the state, or any public body or nonprofit organization.

Where land acquired is deemed to be suitable for industrial, commercial, residential, or recreational development, the commission, with the approval of the secretary, may sell, after appropriate public notice, the land by public sale under a system of competitive bidding, in accordance with the regulations prescribed by the executive director, at not less than fair market value, and the executive director is to ensure that the lands are put to proper use consistent with local, state or federal land use plan, if any, for the area in which the land is located. The executive director, when requested and after appropriate notice, shall hold a public hearing in the county or counties or the appropriate subdivisions of the state in which lands acquired under this section are located. The hearings shall be held at a time which shall afford local citizens and governments the maximum opportunity to participate in the decision concerning the use or disposition of the lands after restoration, reclamation, abatement, control or prevention of the adverse effects of past coal mining practices.

The commission, with the approval of the secretary, may transfer the administrative responsibility for land acquired under this section to any state, regional or local agency, department or institution, with or without cost, employing terms that will ensure the use of the land is consistent with the authorization under which the land was acquired.

The commission may receive grants from the secretary when necessary to carry out provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 426, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 53-9-111.
Review of commission action; formal hearing; landowner rights and remedies.

Any landowner who has received notice of condemnation or acquisition from the commission under Section 53-9-109 may, within fifteen (15) days following the notice, make written application to the commission for a formal hearing regarding the actual need or advisability for the acquisition. The commission shall hear the landowner’s grievance within thirty (30) days following the written application for a hearing and shall make a determination as to the need for the acquisition. The commission’s determination shall be reflected in an order, which may be appealed under Section 49-17-41. Any landowner adversely affected by any other action of the commission under Section 53-9-109 may institute proceedings to have the action reviewed in the chancery court in the county where the property or a part of the property affected by the action is located, provided that the proceedings are filed within thirty (30) days following the date of the action. The court may grant any relief it deems necessary, including, but not limited to, injunctive relief pending a hearing on the matter.

Any landowner subject to condemnation proceedings for sale under Section 53-9-109 shall retain all rights and remedies of law provided by applicable federal and state laws governing condemnation proceedings and sale at public auction. Any landowner, his heir, assignee or personal representative shall have a prior right of purchase at fair market value or the lowest bid, whichever amount is more, over any other purchaser at the public sale provided the lands are put to proper use consistent with any local, state, or federal land use plan, if any, for the area in which the land is located.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 426, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 53-9-113.
Itemization of funds expended; filing of statement in county land records detailing increase in land value from expenditure of fund; statement to constitute lien upon land; hearing and appeal.

Within six (6) months after the completion of projects funded by the commission, in whole or in part, with funds from the Abandoned Mine Lands Reclamation Account to restore, reclaim, abate, control or prevent adverse effects of past mining practices on privately owned land, the executive director shall itemize the funds expended and may file a statement in the land records of the county in which the land lies together with a notarized appraisal by a qualified independent appraiser of the value of the land before the restoration, reclamation, abatement, control or prevention of adverse effects of past coal mining practices, if the funds expended shall result in a significant increase in property value.The statement shall constitute a lien upon the land.The lien shall not exceed the amount determined by the appraisal to be the increase in the market value of the land as a result of the restoration, reclamation, abatement, control or prevention of the adverse effects of past coal mining practices.No lien shall be filed against the property of any person, in accordance with this section, who neither consented to, participated in nor exercised control over the mining operation which necessitated the reclamation performed under this chapter.

Any owner of land subject to a lien imposed pursuant to this section may, within sixty (60) days of the filing of the lien, file a petition in the chancery court of the county in which the land lies to determine the increase in the market value of the land as a result of the reclamation work.The amount determined by the court to be the increase in value of the premises shall constitute the amount of the lien and shall be recorded with the statement required by this section.Any party aggrieved by the decision may appeal as provided by law.

The lien provided in this section shall be entered in the land records in the office in the county in which the land lies. The statement shall constitute a lien upon the land as of the date of the expenditure of the monies and shall have priority as a lien second only to the lien of real estate taxes imposed on the land. Money derived from the satisfaction of liens shall be deposited in the Abandoned Mine Reclamation Account.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 426, § 10; Laws, 2008, ch. 343, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 25, 2008.).

§ 53-9-115.
Governor may request action against certain hazards caused by mining of minerals other than coal; limitations on funds available; acquisition of interest in land.

The Governor may request the secretary to authorize the commission to fill voids, seal open or abandoned tunnels, shafts and entryways, and reclaim surface impacts of underground or surface mining of minerals other than coal which the secretary determines could endanger life and property, constitute a hazard to public health and safety, or degrade the environment.

Funds available for use in carrying out the purpose of this section shall be limited to those funds which must be allocated to the state under the provisions of 30 USC 1232(g)(1) and (5).Projects funded under this section must meet the priorities described in Section 53-9-101(1)(a), but references to coal shall not apply.

In those instances where mine waste piles are being reworked for conservation purposes, the incremental costs of disposing of the wastes from such operations by filling voids and sealing tunnels may be eligible for funding providing that the disposal of these wastes meet the purpose of this section.

The commission, with the approval of the secretary, may acquire by purchase, donation, easement or otherwise an interest in the land it determines is necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 426, § 11; Laws, 2008, ch. 343, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 25, 2008.).

§ 53-9-117.
Interdepartmental cooperation; provision of technical expertise, personnel, equipment, materials, and supplies.

All departments, boards, commissions and agencies of this state shall cooperate with the commission by providing available technical expertise, personnel, equipment, materials and supplies as may be required to implement and administer the provisions of the state abandoned mine lands reclamation program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 426, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 53-9-119.
Injunctions.

The commission, in addition to any other remedies allowed by law, may initiate in the name of the state, in any court of competent jurisdiction, an action in equity for an injunction to restrain any interference with the exercise of the right to enter or to conduct any work provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 426, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 53-9-121.
Power and authority to implement program; promulgation of rules and regulations; cooperative projects.

The commission shall have the power and authority to engage in any work and to do all things necessary or expedient, including promulgation of rules and regulations, to implement and administer the abandoned mine lands reclamation program in Mississippi. The commission also shall have the power and authority to engage in cooperative projects with any other agency of the United States of America or any state or federal agency to achieve the objectives of the abandoned mine lands reclamation program in Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 426, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 53-9-123.
Authority with regard to land affected by noncoal mining practices; agreement of landowner; required findings; limitations on expenditure of funds.

The commission shall have the authority granted in Sections 53-9-107(1) and 53-9-109, as applied to land or water resources that have been adversely affected by mining practices other than coal mining practices, only upon the agreement of the current landowner(s). The commission shall have this authority only after making the findings required by Section 53-9-107(1)(a) and (b), as modified to reflect that the effects were caused by noncoal mining practices. Funds shall not be expended from the Abandoned Mine Lands Reclamation Account on lands adversely affected by mining or processing practices other than coal mining or processing practices unless and until the landowner(s) agrees to abide with all provisions of Section 53-9-113. This section does not limit the authority of the commission to perform any act authorized by the Mississippi Air and Water Pollution Control Law, Section 49-17-1 et seq., the organic act of the commission, Section 49-2-1 et seq., or the Mississippi Surface Mining and Reclamation Law, Section 53-7-1 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 426, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2001.